Utah statutes.
26-26-7.   Adoption of rules by department -- Inspection and investigation of institutions.

(1)  In carrying out the provisions of this chapter, the department may adopt rules for:

(a)  controlling the humane use of animals;

(b)  diagnosis and treatment of human and animal diseases;

(c)  advancement of veterinary, dental, medical, and biological sciences; and

(d)  testing, improvement, and standardization of laboratory specimens, biologic projects, pharmaceuticals, and drugs.

(2)  The department may inspect or investigate any institution that applies for or is authorized to obtain animals.



Amended by Chapter 80, 1989 General Session

